Hawaii statutes.
§132-13 Penalty. Any owner, occupant,
or other person having control over or charge of any building, structure, or
other premises who violates any provision of this chapter or any law,
ordinance, or rule relating to protection from fire loss or who fails or
refuses to comply with any order of the county fire chief shall be fined not
more than $500 or imprisoned not more than thirty days, or both. [L 1917, c
115, pt of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; am L 1929, c 24, §1; am imp L 1932 1st, c
13; am L 1933-4, c 28, §1; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(21); RL
1945, §8538; RL 1955, §184-15; HRS §132-15; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(16)]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next